Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-230
Veterans preference; violations; penalty.

Any person who violates sections 48-225 to 48-231 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Such person shall be prohibited from receiving any compensation from public funds until he or she complies with sections 48-225 to 48-231.

Laws 1969, c. 751, § 6, p. 2827;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 279;

Laws 2002, LB 722, § 1.